District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

1-1101.01

Definitions.

Repealed.

History

Aug. 14, 1974, 88 Stat. 447, Pub. L. 93-376, title I, § 102
Sept. 2, 1976, D.C. Law 1-79, title VIII, § 806, 23 DCR 2050
Apr. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 1-126, title IV, § 402, 24 DCR 2372
Aug. 18, 1978, D.C. Law 2-101, § 3, 25 DCR 257
June 7, 1979, D.C. Law 3-1, § 3(a), 25 DCR 9454
Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-88, § 3(a), (p), (r), (s), 29 DCR 458
Feb. 2, 2008, D.C. Law 17-104, § 8, 54 DCR 12218
Sept. 12, 2008, D.C. Law 17-231, § 6(a), 55 DCR 6758
April 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 501(d), 59 DCR 1862

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1401.
1973 Ed., § 1-1121.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 7 of Exploratory Committee Disclosure Informational Report and Contribution Prohibition Temporary Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Law 16-34, October 20, 2005, law notification 52 DCR 10008).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 7 of Exploratory Committee Regulation Temporary Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Law 17-2, April 18, 2007, law notification 54 DCR 6581).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 7 of Exploratory Committee Disclosure Informational Report and Contribution Prohibition Emergency Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-100, June 21, 2005, 52 DCR 6086).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 7 of Exploratory Committee Disclosure Information Report and Contribution Prohibition Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-178, October 4, 2005, 52 DCR 9076).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 6 of Exploratory Committee Regulation Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-13, January 29, 2007, 54 DCR 1520).
For temporary (90 day) addition of sections, see §§ 2 to 237 of Board of Ethics and Government Accountability Establishment and Comprehensive Ethics Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-298, January 29, 2012, 59 DCR 683).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 401(d) of Board of Ethics and Government Accountability Establishment and Comprehensive Ethics Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-298, January 29, 2012, 59 DCR 683).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 501(a) to (i) of Board of Ethics and Government Accountability Establishment and Comprehensive Ethics Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-298, January 29, 2012, 59 DCR 683).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of chapter to Law 11-144: Section 4 of D.C. Law 11-144, the Contribution Limitation Initiative Amendment Act of 1996, provided that D.C. Code § 1-1101.01 et seq. shall apply to the act. D.C. Law 11-144 repeals § 1-1104.01 and amends §§ 1-1131.01, 1-1131.03, and 1-1104.02.